Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB367.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Flexible Working Arrangements Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Employee." A person who is employed by an employer or may be permitted, required or directed by an employer to perform services in consideration of direct or indirect gain or profit."Employer." An individual, organization or governmental 123456789101112131415161718 body, including a partnership, association, trustee, estate, corporation, joint stock company, insurance company, or legal representative, whether domestic or foreign, or the receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, trustee or successor thereof, and any common carrier by mail, motor, water, air or express company doing business in or operating within this Commonwealth, and any agent of the employer, that has 50 or more individuals performing services for the employer within this Commonwealth."Flexible working arrangement." Intermediate or long-term changes in the employee's regular working arrangements, including changes in the number of days or hours worked, changes in the time the employee arrives at or departs from work, work from home or job sharing. The term does not include vacation, routine scheduling of shifts or another form of employee leave."Inconsistent with business operations." A determination by an employer based on the following considerations:(1) The burden on an employer of undue additional costs.(2) A legitimate or practical detrimental effect on aggregate employee morale unrelated to discrimination or other unlawful employment practices.(3) A legitimate or practical detrimental effect on the ability of an employer to meet consumer demand.(4) A significant inability to reorganize work among existing staff.(5) A legitimate or practical inability to recruit additional staff.(6) A detrimental impact on business quality or business performance.(7) An insufficiency of work during the periods that the employee proposes to work.20250HB0367PN0323 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) Planned structural changes to the business.(9) Other reasonable concerns that would negatively impact business operations.Section 3. Employee's right to request a flexible working arrangement.An employee may request from the employee's employer a flexible working arrangement that meets the needs of both the employer and employee. An employee may make a request under this section to the same employer once per year.Section 4. Duties of employer.(a) Consideration of request.--An employer shall consider an employee's request under section 3 in good faith and the employer shall determine whether the employee's request or a similar arrangement could be granted in a manner that is not inconsistent with business operations or legal or contractual obligations.(b) Decision of request.--An employer shall notify an employee who made a request under section 3 of the employer's decision in a reasonably timely manner. If an employee's request under section 3 was in writing, the employer shall issue a decision of a complete or partial denial in writing.(c) Standards.--An employer may establish reasonable standards to determine the time, place and manner in which the employer may discuss the request of an employee under section 3.(d) Retaliation prohibited.--An employer may not retaliate against an employee who makes a request under section 3.Section 5. Duties of department.The department shall promulgate regulations for the implementation of this act.Section 6. Enforcement.20250HB0367PN0323 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Duties of department.--The department shall enforce and investigate alleged violations of this act. In enforcing and investigating alleged violations of this act, the department may subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, examine witnesses and take testimony or compel the production of documents for the purpose of ascertaining an employer's compliance with this act.(b) No private cause of action.--A violation of this act shall not create a private cause of action.Section 7. Penalties.An employer who violates this act shall be subject to the following:(1) For a first violation, the department shall issue a warning letter to the employer detailing the violation and provide the employer with 30 days to correct the violation.(2) For a second or subsequent violation, the department may assess an administrative fee up to $500 per violation.Section 8. Miscellaneous provisions.Nothing in this act shall:(1) Affect legal rights an employer or employee may have under applicable law to create, terminate or modify a flexible working arrangement.(2) Diminish employment rights or agreements pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement.(3) Require an employer to accept a flexible working arrangement of an employee under section 3.(4) Prohibit an employer from instituting a flexible working arrangement policy that is more generous than an employee's request.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB0367PN0323 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930